Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 656. JOB NOTICES AND TRAINING

SUBCHAPTER A. EMPLOYMENT OPENINGS

Sec. 656.001. STATE AGENCY EMPLOYMENT OPENING. Any agency, board, bureau, commission, committee, council, court, department, institution, or office in the executive or judicial branch of state government that has an employment opening for which persons from outside the agency will be considered shall list the opening with the Texas Workforce Commission.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 817, Sec. 10.05, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 656.002. ONLINE STATE AGENCY EMPLOYMENT APPLICATIONS. (a) In this section, "state agency" does not include an institution of higher education or university system as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(b) The online system for listing state agency employment openings maintained by the Texas Workforce Commission must allow an applicant for employment to complete a single state application online and enter the application into an online database from which the applicant may electronically send the application to multiple state agencies.

(c) The Texas Workforce Commission shall:

(1) prescribe a standard electronic format for the online application described by Subsection (b); and

(2) ensure that the commission's online system allows an applicant to submit and a state agency to receive an online application for state agency employment.

(d) A state agency shall accept an application for an employment opening from the online system maintained by the Texas Workforce Commission.

(e) This section does not prohibit a state agency from accepting an application for an employment opening in a manner other than the manner described by this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 273 (H.B. 426), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 656.003. MILITARY OCCUPATIONAL SPECIALTY CODES ON NOTICES OF EMPLOYMENT OPENINGS. A state agency shall include on all forms and notices related to a state agency employment opening the military occupational specialty code for each branch of the armed forces of the United States, identified as provided by Section 654.0375, that corresponds to the employment opening if the duties of the available position correlate with a military occupational specialty.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 111 (S.B. 389), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 656.002 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(19), eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. JOB NOTICES

Sec. 656.021. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas Workforce Commission.

(2) "State agency" means:

(A) a department, commission, board, office, or other agency that:

(i) is in the executive branch of state government;

(ii) has authority that is not limited to a geographical portion of this state; and

(iii) was created by the constitution or a statute of this state; or

(B) a university system or an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, other than a public junior college.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 817, Sec. 10.06, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 656.022. SUBMISSION OF JOB INFORMATION FORMS. As soon as possible after a job vacancy occurs or is filled in Travis County in a state agency, the agency shall complete and deliver to the commission the appropriate information form prescribed by the commission and pertaining to the job vacancy or placement.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 760, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 656.023. JOB INFORMATION FORMS. (a) The commission shall prescribe the forms for information from state agencies necessary for the commission to serve as a central processing agency for state agency job opportunities in Travis County.

(b) A form prescribed by the commission under Subsection (a) must include a space for a state agency to list a military occupational specialty code as provided by Section 656.003.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 111 (S.B. 389), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.002(9), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 656.024. PUBLIC NOTICE OF JOB VACANCIES. The commission shall publicly list, in accordance with the commission's procedures, for at least 10 working days, each notice of a job vacancy delivered under Section 656.022 unless the commission is sooner notified by the state agency having the vacancy that the vacancy has been filled.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 656.025. OTHER EFFORTS TO INFORM SOURCES OF VACANCIES. A state agency is encouraged to continue other efforts used to inform outside applicant recruitment sources of job vacancies.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 656.026. JOB NOTICE POSTING WAIVER. A state agency is not required to comply with the requirements of this subchapter or Subchapter A when the agency transfers or reassigns an employee as part of a reorganization or merger mandated by the legislature if the executive head of the agency certifies that the transfer or reassignment is necessary for the proper implementation of the reorganization or merger.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 656.027. MILITARY EMPLOYMENT PREFERENCE ON STATE EMPLOYMENT FORMS. The commission shall include on all forms relating to state agency employment that are prescribed by the commission under this subchapter or other law a statement regarding the requirement prescribed by Chapter 657 that each state agency give a military employment preference until the agency workforce is composed of at least 20 percent individuals who qualify for a military employment preference under Section 657.002.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 69, Sec. 2, eff. May 16, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1100 (S.B. 1376), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. TRAINING

Sec. 656.041. SHORT TITLE. This subchapter may be cited as the State Employees Training Act.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 656.042. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE. Programs for the training and education of state administrators and employees materially aid effective state administration, and public money spent on those programs serves an important public purpose.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 656.043. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "state agency" means a department, agency, or institution of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government, including an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 366 (H.B. 3337), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 656.044. PUBLIC FUNDS FOR TRAINING AND EDUCATION. A state agency may use public funds to provide training and education for its administrators and employees. The training or education must be related to the duties or prospective duties of the administrator or employee.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 656.045. REQUIRED ATTENDANCE AT PROGRAM. A state agency may require an administrator or employee of the agency to attend, as all or part of the administrator's or employee's duties, a training or education program if the training or education is related to the administrator's or employee's duties or prospective duties.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 656.046. PURPOSES OF PROGRAM. A state agency's training and educational program may include:

(1) preparing for technological and legal developments;

(2) increasing work capabilities;

(3) increasing the number of qualified employees in areas designated by institutions of higher education as having an acute faculty shortage; and

(4) increasing the competence of state employees.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 656.047. PAYMENT OF PROGRAM AND CERTIFICATION EXAMINATION EXPENSES. (a) Except as provided by this section or other law, a state agency may spend public funds as appropriate to pay the salary, tuition and other fees, travel and living expenses, training stipend, expense of training materials, and other necessary expenses of an instructor, student, or other participant in a training or education program.

(a-1) A state agency may spend public funds as appropriate to reimburse a state agency employee or administrator who serves in an information technology, cybersecurity, or other cyber-related position for fees associated with industry-recognized certification examinations.

(b) For an administrator or employee of a state agency who seeks reimbursement for a training or education program offered by an institution of higher education or private or independent institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, the agency may only pay the tuition expenses for a program course successfully completed by the administrator or employee at an accredited institution of higher education.

(c) A state agency that spends more than $5,000 in a state fiscal year for a training or education program for any individual administrator or employee shall, not later than August 31 of that year, submit to the Legislative Budget Board a report including:

(1) a list of the administrators and employees participating in a training or education program;

(2) the amount spent on each administrator or employee; and

(3) the certification earned by each administrator or employee through the training or education program.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 366 (H.B. 3337), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (S.B. 255), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 509 (S.B. 64), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 509 (S.B. 64), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 656.048. RULES RELATING TO TRAINING AND EDUCATION. (a) A state agency shall adopt rules relating to:

(1) the eligibility of the agency's administrators and employees for training and education supported by the agency; and

(2) the obligations assumed by the administrators and employees on receiving the training and education.

(b) A state agency shall adopt rules requiring that before an administrator or employee of the agency may be reimbursed under Section 656.047(b), the executive head of the agency must authorize the tuition reimbursement payment.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 16(g), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 366 (H.B. 3337), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 656.049. AUTHORITY TO CONTRACT. A state agency may contract with another state, local, or federal department, agency, or institution, including a state-supported college or university, to train or educate its administrators and employees or may join in presenting a training or educational program.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 656.050. TRAINING IN CONTRACT NEGOTIATION FOR PURCHASES OF INFORMATION RESOURCES TECHNOLOGIES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Department" means the Department of Information Resources.

(2) "Information resources technologies" has the meaning assigned by Section 2054.003.

(a-1) The department, with the cooperation of the comptroller and other appropriate state agencies, shall develop and implement a program to train state agency personnel in effectively negotiating contracts for the purchase of information resources technologies.

(b) The department shall make the training available to state agency personnel who are directly or indirectly involved in contract negotiations, such as senior or operational management, purchasers, users of the purchased technologies, and personnel with relevant technical, legal, or financial knowledge. State agency personnel directly involved in contract negotiations for the purchase of information resources technologies shall complete the training developed by the department.

(c) The department shall include in the training:

(1) information on developing a structured purchasing method that meets an agency's needs;

(2) information drawn from the state's previous procurement experience about what is or is not advantageous for the state;

(3) the perspective of state agencies with oversight responsibilities related to the state's procurement of information resources technologies;

(4) information on how to use contracts entered into by the department under Section 2157.068; and

(5) other information that the department considers to be useful.

(d) The department may use its own staff or contract with private entities or other state agencies to conduct the training.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 538, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 2054.060 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(56), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.65, eff. September 1, 2007.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Section 2054.057 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (S.B. 255), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 656.051. TRAINING AND CERTIFICATION OF STATE AGENCY PURCHASING PERSONNEL AND VENDORS. (a) The comptroller shall establish and administer a system of training, continuing education, and certification for state agency purchasing personnel. The training and continuing education for state agency purchasing personnel must include ethics training. The comptroller may establish and offer appropriate training to vendors on a cost recovery basis. The comptroller may adopt rules to administer this section.

(b) The training, continuing education, and certification required under Subsection (a) must include:

(1) training on the selection of an appropriate procurement method by project type; and

(2) training conducted by the Department of Information Resources on purchasing technologies.

(c) Notwithstanding Subsection (i), all state agency purchasing personnel, including agencies exempted from the purchasing authority of the comptroller, must receive the training and continuing education to the extent required by the comptroller. A state agency employee who is required to receive the training may not participate in purchases by the employing agency unless the employee has received the required training or received equivalent training from a national association recognized by the comptroller.

(d) The comptroller may provide training, continuing education, and certification under this section to purchasing personnel employed by a political subdivision or other public entity of the state. Political subdivision purchasing personnel may receive, but are not required to receive, the training, continuing education, or certification provided under this section.

(e) The training provided by the comptroller must include instruction in:

(1) contract purchasing methods;

(2) ethical issues affecting purchasing decisions;

(3) negotiation methods;

(4) writing specifications;

(5) the criteria for determining which product or service offers the best value for the state;

(6) developing evaluation criteria;

(7) formal and informal bidding methods;

(8) complex negotiations; and

(9) any other processes and issues that the comptroller considers appropriate for purchasing training.

(f) The comptroller may prescribe the circumstances under which a state agency may delegate to a certified purchaser signature purchasing authority to approve purchase orders.

(g) The comptroller shall require a reasonable number of hours of continuing education to maintain certification. The comptroller may allow attendance at equivalent certification training recognized by the comptroller to count toward the required number of hours. Maintenance of certification may be by yearly renewal or another reasonable renewal period comparable to nationally recognized certification requirements. The comptroller shall adopt rules to monitor compliance with this subsection.

(h) The comptroller shall certify a state agency employee as a state agency purchaser when the employee has:

(1) completed the training required by this section or as prescribed by rule; and

(2) passed a written examination.

(i) This section does not apply to an institution to which Section 51.9335, Education Code, applies or to an institution to which Section 73.115, Education Code, applies.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1206, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec.31.01(21), eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 426, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 309, Sec. 7.05, eff. June 18, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 2.07, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 326 (S.B. 20), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Section 2155.078 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (S.B. 255), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 656.052. TRAINING AND CERTIFICATION FOR CONTRACT MANAGERS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Contract management guide" means the guide developed under Section 2262.051.

(2) "Contract manager" has the meaning assigned by Section 2262.001.

(a-1) In coordination with the Department of Information Resources, state auditor, and Health and Human Services Commission, the comptroller shall develop a training program for contract managers.

(b) The training must provide the contract manager with information regarding how to:

(1) fairly and objectively select and negotiate with the most qualified contractor;

(2) establish prices that are cost-effective and that reflect the cost of providing the service;

(3) include provisions in a contract that hold the contractor accountable for results;

(4) monitor and enforce a contract;

(5) make payments consistent with the contract;

(6) comply with any requirements or goals contained in the contract management guide;

(7) use and apply advanced sourcing strategies, techniques, and tools;

(8) maintain required documentation for contracting decisions, changes to a contract, and problems with a contract;

(9) create a risk evaluation and mitigation strategy;

(10) create a plan for potential problems with the contract;

(11) develop an accurate and comprehensive statement of work; and

(12) complete the contract and evaluate performance under the contract.

(c) Each state agency shall ensure that the agency's contract managers complete the training developed under this section.

(d) The comptroller shall administer training under this section and may assess a fee for the training in an amount sufficient to recover the comptroller's costs under this section.

(e) The comptroller shall certify contract managers who have completed the contract management training required under this section.

(f) A state agency may develop qualified contract manager training to supplement the training required under this section. The comptroller may incorporate the training developed by the agency into the training program under this section.

(g) The comptroller shall adapt the training required under this section and administer an abbreviated training program meeting the relevant training requirements under this section for state agency employees, other than contract managers, with contract management duties.

(h) This section does not apply to:

(1) an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; or

(2) a contract manager whose contract management duties relate primarily to contracts described by Section 2262.002(b).

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1422, Sec. 5.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 309, Sec. 7.22, eff. June 18, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1081 (H.B. 2918), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1227 (S.B. 1681), Sec. 3, eff. November 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 326 (S.B. 20), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Section 2262.053 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (S.B. 255), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 656.053. TRAINING FOR GOVERNING BODIES. (a) In this section, "state agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 2056.001.

(a-1) The comptroller shall adapt the program developed under Section 656.052 to provide an abbreviated program for training the members of the governing bodies of state agencies. The training may be provided together with other required training for members of state agency governing bodies.

(b) All members of the governing body of a state agency shall complete at least one course of the training provided under this section. This subsection does not apply to a state agency that does not enter into any contracts.

(c) The comptroller may assess a fee for the training provided under this section in an amount sufficient to recover the comptroller's costs under this section.

(d) This section does not apply to the Texas Transportation Commission.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1227 (S.B. 1681), Sec. 4, eff. November 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 326 (S.B. 20), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Section 2262.0535 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (S.B. 255), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 656.054. PURCHASING AND CONTRACT MANAGEMENT TRAINING BY COMPTROLLER. (a) The comptroller shall develop training programs provided by the comptroller under this subchapter to meet the needs of state agencies.

(b) Each year a state agency shall estimate the number of employees requiring purchasing or contract management training and report the anticipated training needs of the state agency to the comptroller in the manner and form prescribed by the comptroller.

(c) On an annual basis the comptroller shall assess the number of employees requiring purchasing or contract management training and shall maintain a regular schedule of classes to accommodate that number.

(d) The comptroller may use staff or contract with private or public entities, including state agencies, to conduct the training.

(e) The comptroller may assess a fee for a training program, including continuing education and certification, in an amount sufficient to recover the costs incurred by the comptroller to provide the training program under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (S.B. 255), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 656.055. PURCHASING AND CONTRACT MANAGEMENT TRAINING BY AGENCY. (a) A state agency, in consultation with the comptroller, may develop agency-specific purchasing and contract management training programs to be administered by the agency to the agency's employees instead of or as a supplement to training programs developed by the comptroller under this subchapter.

(b) An employee who participates in an agency-specific training program under this section remains subject to any other applicable certification requirements established for training programs under this subchapter, including written or oral examinations administered by the comptroller.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (S.B. 255), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER D. RESTRICTIONS ON CERTAIN TRAINING

Sec. 656.101. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "State agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 656.043.

(1-a) "State employee" has the meaning assigned by Section 572.002.

(2) "Training" means instruction, teaching, or other education received by a state employee that is not normally received by other state employees and that is designed to enhance the ability of the employee to perform the employee's job. The term includes a course of study at an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, if the employing state agency spends money to assist the state employee to meet the expense of the course of study or pays salary to the employee to undertake the course of study as an assigned duty. The term does not include training required either by state or federal law or that is determined necessary by the agency and offered to all employees of the agency performing similar jobs.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1178, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 366 (H.B. 3337), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 656.102. AGENCY POLICY. (a) Before a state agency spends any money on training for a state employee, the state agency must adopt a policy governing the training of employees, in addition to the rules required by Section 656.048, that requires training to relate to an employee's duties following the training.

(b) The policy must:

(1) provide clear and objective guidelines to govern tuition reimbursement for an administrator or employee of a state agency who is enrolled in training for which the administrator or employee seeks reimbursement from this state; and

(2) address tuition reimbursement for nontraditional training, including online courses or courses not credited towards a degree.

(c) The state agency shall post the policy adopted under this section on the employment section of the agency's Internet website.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1178, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 366 (H.B. 3337), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 656.103. RESTRICTIONS. (a) If a state employee receives training that is paid for by a state agency, and during the training period the employee does not perform the employee's regular duties for three or more months as a result of the training, a policy adopted under Section 656.102 must include a requirement that the employee:

(1) work for the agency following the training for at least one month for each month of the training period; or

(2) pay the agency for all the costs associated with the training that were paid during the training period, including any amounts of the employee's salary that were paid and that were not accounted for as paid vacation or compensatory leave.

(b) Before a state employee receives training that will be paid for by a state agency and during which the employee will not be performing the employee's regular duties for three months or more, the agency shall require the employee to agree in writing, before the training begins, to comply with the requirements prescribed under Subsection (a).

(c) By an order adopted in a public meeting, the governing body of a state agency may waive the requirements prescribed under Subsection (a) and release a state employee from the obligation to meet those requirements if the governing body finds that such action is in the best interest of the agency or is warranted because of an extreme personal hardship suffered by the employee.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1178, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 656.104. LIABILITY. If a state employee does not provide the services required in accordance with Section 656.103(a)(1), provides those services for less than the required term, or fails to make payments required in accordance with Section 656.103(a)(2) and the employee is not released from the obligation to provide the services or to make the payments under Section 656.103(c), the employee is liable to the state agency for any costs described by Section 656.103(a)(2) and for the agency's reasonable expenses incurred in obtaining payment, including reasonable attorney's fees.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1178, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.